District of Columbia statutes.
26-632

Construction of legal and financial terms used in chapter.

Legal and financial terms used in this chapter refer to equivalent terms used by the country in which the international banking corporation is organized.

History

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-268, § 3, 48 DCR 1251